Hawaii statutes.
§396-10 Violations and penalties. (a)
Any employer who violates this chapter, or any occupational safety and health
standard promulgated hereunder or any rule or regulation issued under the
authority of this chapter, or who violates or fails to comply with any
citation, notice or order made under or by virtue of this chapter or under or
by virtue of any rule or regulation of the department, or who defaces,
displaces, destroys, damages, or removes without the authority of the
department any safety device, safeguards, notice or warning required by this
chapter or any rule or regulation of the department may be assessed a civil
penalty as specified in this chapter.

(b) Any employer who has received an order or
citation for a serious violation of any standard or rule adopted pursuant to
this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $7,700 for each
violation.

(c) Any employer who has received an order or
citation for a violation of any standard or rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter, and the violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious
nature, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to $7,700 for each violation.

(d) Each day a violation continues shall
constitute a separate violation except that during an abatement period only, no
additional penalty shall be levied against the employer.

(e) Any employer who violates any of the
posting requirements prescribed under this chapter shall be assessed a civil
penalty of up to $7,700 for each violation.

(f) Any employer who wilfully or repeatedly
violates this chapter, or any standard, rule, citation, or order issued under
the authority of this chapter, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less
than $5,500 nor more than $77,000 for each violation.

(g) Any employer convicted of wilful or
repeated violations of any standard, rule, citation, or order issued under the
authority of this chapter resulting in the death of an employee shall be
punished by a fine of not more than $77,000 or by imprisonment for not more
than six months, or both, except that if the conviction is for a violation
committed after a first conviction, punishment shall be by a fine of not more
than $77,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Failure
to correct a violation for which an order or citation of arrest has been issued
shall be evidence of wilful conduct.

(h) Any employer who has received an order for
violation under section 396-8(e) may be assessed a civil penalty of not more
than $1,100 for each violation.

(i) Any person who gives advance notice of any
inspection to be conducted under this chapter, without authority from the
director or the director's designees shall, upon conviction, be punished by a
fine of not more than $1,100 or by imprisonment for not more than six months,
or by both.

(j) The director shall have authority to
assess all civil penalties provided in this section, giving due consideration
to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the business
of the employer being charged, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of
the employer, and the history of previous violations.

(k) Civil penalties imposed under this chapter
shall be paid to the department and may be recovered by civil action in the
name of the department and the State brought in the district or circuit court
for the circuit where the violation is alleged to have occurred or where the
employer has its principal office.

(l) When an alleged violation of any provision
of this chapter or any standard, rule, or order made thereunder has occurred,
the department shall promptly issue a written citation, order, or notice
thereof to the employer who shall be required to post the citation, order, or
notice. The citation, order, or notice thereof shall include the abatement
requirements and within a reasonable time the employer shall be advised of the
proposed sanctions, including proposed penalties. Whenever reference is made
to posting of any citation, order, notice, petition, decision, or any other
type of document issued by the director under this chapter and rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter, the employer shall post copies of the document at the
work site involved or affected and at the place or places where notices to the
employees involved are normally posted. Where posting starts the time for
notice of action to or for appeal by employees under this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter, the document shall be posted by the employer upon
receipt or on the next business day following receipt.

(m) Whoever knowingly makes any false
statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report,
plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this
chapter shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than $11,000,
or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

(n) Criminal offenses committed against any
employee of the State acting within the scope of the employee's office,
employment, or authority under this chapter shall be subject to the penalties set
forth in the Hawaii Penal Code; provided that:

(1) Ten years shall be added to the maximum term of
imprisonment (unless life imprisonment is imposed) and $55,000 shall be added
to the maximum fine imposed for conviction of a class A felony;

(2) Five years shall be added to the maximum term of
imprisonment and $27,500 shall be added to the maximum fine imposed for
conviction of a class B felony;

(3) Three years shall be added to the maximum term of
imprisonment and $11,000 shall be added to the maximum fine for conviction of a
class C felony;

(4) One year shall be added to the maximum term of
imprisonment and $2,200 shall be added to the maximum fine for conviction of a
misdemeanor; and

(5) The maximum term of imprisonment and maximum
fines prescribed for misdemeanors under the Hawaii Penal Code shall apply to
convictions of a petty misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 57, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 152,
§5; am L 1975, c 50, §4; am L 1976, c 95, §8; am L 1977, c 179, §3; gen ch
1985; am L 1992, c 94, §§1 to 3; am L 1993, c 175, §2; am L 2011, c 123, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next